Alaska statutes. Title 30. Navigation, Harbors, Shipping, and Transportation Facilities.
Chapter 50. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 30.50.010.
Interfering with buoys and beacons.

A person who moors a vessel, boat, skiff, barge, scow, raft, or part of a raft to a buoy or beacon placed in the navigable waters of the state, or in a bay, river, or arm of the sea bordering the state by the authority of the United States Coast Guard, or who hangs on with a vessel, boat, skiff, barge, scow, raft, or part of a raft to the buoy or beacon, or who wilfully removes, damages, or destroys the buoy or beacon, or who cuts down, removes, damages, or destroys a beacon erected on land in the state by authority of the United States Coast Guard is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $200, or by imprisonment in a jail for not less than one month nor more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 65-14-2 ACLA 1949; am § 22 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 11.65.020. Renumbered in 1978.

Sec. 30.50.020.
Discharging ballast into navigable waters.

A person, whether or not an officer of a vessel, who discharges the ballast of a vessel into the navigable portion or channel of a bay, harbor, or river of the state, or within the jurisdiction of the state, so as to injuriously affect the navigable portion or channel, or to obstruct the navigation of the navigable portion or channel, upon conviction, is punishable by imprisonment in a jail for not less than three months nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500.

History.

(§ 65-14-1 ACLA 1949; am § 22 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

11.65.010

. Renumbered in 1978.

Cross references. —

For ballast water discharge, see AS

46.03.750

.